Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Financial Disclosure

6.781.
Individuals required to file statements of financial interests.

The following individuals shall file a sworn statement of financial interests with the commission:

Members of the General Assembly;

All candidates and nominees for election to the General Assembly; and

Major management personnel in the legislative branch of state government, including the director, deputy directors, and assistant directors of the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 18, effective September 16, 1993.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), contained an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89, and 90, §§ 1-84 of the Act should become effective two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows: “within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within 150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993; “within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.

6.784.
Exceptions to financial disclosure requirements.

KRS

6.781

to

6.794

do not require the disclosure of financial information concerning the following:

A spouse separated from a filer;

A former spouse of a filer;

A gift or loan to or from a family member;

A campaign contribution permitted and reported pursuant to KRS Chapter 121; or

A gift or loan from a wholly-owned family business.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 19, effective September 16, 1993; 2005, ch. 105, § 14, effective March 16, 2005.

6.785.
Lobbying for compensation by legislator prohibited. [Repealed.]

6.787.
Statements of financial disclosure — Form — Contents.

The statement of financial interests required by KRS

6.781

shall be filed on a form prescribed by the commission. The commission shall provide copies of the form without charge to any person required to file.

The statement shall include the following information for the preceding calendar year:

Name, business address, business telephone number, and home address of the filer;

Title of the filer’s public position or office sought;

Any other occupations of filer and spouse;

Positions held by the filer or his spouse in any business, partnership, corporation for profit, or corporation not for profit from which the filer receives compensation, and the name of that business, partnership, or corporation;

Names and addresses of all businesses, investments, or securities in which the filer, his spouse, or children has or had at any time during the preceding year an interest of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) at fair market value or five percent (5%) ownership interest or more;

Sources of gross income of the filer and his spouse, information concerning the source, and the form of the income;

All positions of a fiduciary nature in a business;

A designation as commercial, residential, or rural, and the location of all real property, other than the filer’s primary residence, in which there is an interest of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more held by the filer, his spouse, or children;

Sources of gifts of money or property with a retail value of more than two hundred dollars ($200) to the filer or the filer’s immediate family, except those from a member of the filer’s family;

The name of any creditor owed more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), except debts arising from the purchase of consumer goods. As used in this paragraph, the term “consumer goods” has the same meaning as in KRS

355.9-102

;

The name of any legislative agent who is:

A member of the filer’s immediate family;

A partner of the filer, or a partner of a member of the filer’s immediate family;

An officer or director of the filer’s employer;

An employer of the filer or an employer of a member of the filer’s immediate family; or

A business associate of the filer or a business associate of a member of the filer’s immediate family;

The names of any of the filer’s clients who are legislative agents or employers; and

An answer to the question, “If you have held a professional license during the filing period, has a properly licensed partner of yours engaged in the practice of cases or other matters which you are prohibited from practicing under KRS

6.744

?” If the filer responds affirmatively, he shall also list the names of the clients represented and list the agencies before which the partner made an appearance. These lists shall be separate and need not identify which client was represented before a specific agency.

Paragraphs (a) to (j) of subsection (2) of this section shall not require disclosure of specific dollar amounts. Paragraph (f) shall not require the disclosure of the names of clients or customers of business entities listed as sources of income.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 23, effective September 16, 1993; 2000, ch. 408, § 175, effective July 1, 2001.

6.790.
Renumbered as KRS 6.751, effective September 16, 1993.

6.791.
Public record status of statements of financial disclosure — Retention requirements for commission.

Upon receipt by the commission, a statement of financial interests shall be a public record available for copying. A statement may be reviewed and copied at the office of the commission during ordinary business hours.

A statement of financial interests shall be retained by the commission for five (5) years after filing in a form, including microfilming, that shall facilitate document retention, except that:

Upon the expiration of three (3) years after an individual ceases to be a member of the General Assembly, or an individual employed in a position listed in KRS 6.781(3) ceases to be employed in that position, the commission shall destroy any statements of financial interests or copies of those statements filed by the individual and which are in the possession of the commission, unless the individual is otherwise required to file a statement; and

Upon the expiration of three (3) years after any election at which a candidate for the General Assembly was not elected or nominated, the commission shall destroy any statements of financial interests or copies of those statements filed by him as a candidate, unless the individual is otherwise required to file a statement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 22, effective September 16, 1993.

6.793.
Time schedule for filing statements of financial interests.

The statement of financial interests required by KRS

6.781

shall be filed with the commission for the preceding calendar year by no later than February 15 of each year, complete through December 31 of the preceding year, except that:

A candidate for nomination or election to the General Assembly shall file his statement no later than twenty-one (21) days after the filing deadline as set by the law or within ten (10) days of the filing deadline if it is a special election date he became a candidate as defined in KRS

6.611

; and

An individual appointed to a position listed in KRS

6.781

(3) shall file his initial statement no later than twenty-one (21) days after the date of his appointment.

The commission may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing a statement of financial interests for good cause shown.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 20, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 479, § 1, effective April 11, 1994; 2000, ch. 493, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2000). The extraneous phrase “date he became a candidate as defined in KRS

6.611

” at the end of subsection (1)(a) of this statute could not be removed from the amended version of this statute in codification even though its deletion was specified in the drafter’s version for 2000 Ky. Acts, ch. 493 (House Bill 712) because the indicated bracketing and striking through of the phrase was inadvertently overlooked in the preparation and proofing of the bill for introduction. Cf. KRS 446.145(1) and

446.280

.

6.794.
Ten-day grace period for filing of statements of financial interests.

A filer submitting a statement of financial interests within ten (10) days of the statutory deadline or the deadline authorized by the commission shall be subject to no penalty.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 24, effective September 16, 1993.

6.795.
Renumbered as KRS 6.744, effective September 16, 1993.

6.797.
Notice of filing deficiency — Penalties for deficient or false filing.

The commission shall notify by certified mail each person required to file a statement of financial interests who fails to file the statement in a timely manner, completely, or in the form required by the commission. The notice shall specify the type of failure or delinquency and shall advise the person of the penalties for violation of this section.

Any person who fails to file the statement or who fails to remedy a deficiency in his filing identified by the commission in the notice under subsection (1) of this section in a timely manner may be fined by the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, up to a maximum total fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) without the necessity of a complaint being filed, notwithstanding KRS 6.686(1)(a), but only after notice has been given to the alleged violator of the intent of the commission to impose a fine, including the amount of the fine, and an opportunity has been afforded the alleged violator to appear before the commission or otherwise offer evidence as he may choose in mitigation of the imposition of the fine.

Any person who intentionally files a statement of financial interests which he knows to contain false information or to omit required information shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 21, effective September 16, 1993; 2000, ch. 493, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.

6.800.
Renumbered as KRS 6.764, effective September 16, 1993.